Hawaii statutes.
[§356D-156] Rules. The authority may
adopt under chapter 91 all rules necessary to carry out the purpose of this
part, including rules relating to determining preference among applicants for
state rent supplements. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next